Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-139
Special tax fund; reversion to general fund.

Whenever a tax is levied for the payment of a specific debt, the amount of such tax collected shall be kept as a separate fund in the county treasury, and expended only in the liquidation of such indebtedness; Provided, any surplus remaining in the treasury after full payment of such indebtedness shall be transferred to the general fund of the county.

Laws 1879, § 41, p. 367;

R.S.1913, § 969;

C.S.1922, § 869;

C.S.1929, § 26-123;

R.S.1943, § 23-139.

Beneficial owners of taxes enforced by trustee for governmental subdivisions in tax foreclosure suit are entitled to a strict accounting of the avails of the tax foreclosure on the basis of the integrity of separate tax funds involved. Darnell v. City of Broken Bow, 139 Neb. 844, 299 N.W. 274 (1941).